Utah statutes.
9-4-923.   Allocation to corporation of mortgage bonds qualified under
Internal Revenue Code.
(1)  The entire amount of qualified mortgage bonds allowable to Utah pursuant
to 26 U.S.C., Section 143, and the regulations issued under the code, is
allocated to the Utah Housing Corporation which, for purposes of 26 U.S.C.,
Section 143 and the regulations under that section, has sole responsibility
for issuing or approving the issuance of qualified mortgage bonds allowable to
Utah.
(2)  The corporation is not required to issue or approve the issuance of
qualified mortgage bonds equal in amount to the amount allowed Utah.
(3)  Housing authorities in counties, cities, and towns in Utah may apply
under 26 U.S.C., Section 143 to the corporation for funding of housing
programs within their respective jurisdictions.
